Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4848
Records; disposition.

Whenever it appears to the director that the records of any insurer in process of liquidation or completely liquidated are no longer useful, he or she may recommend to the court and the court shall direct what records should be retained for future reference and what should be destroyed.

Laws 1989, LB 319, § 48.